src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON l34_5 ! sloppin
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:pin  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:nan  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:pins # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:nir  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:na   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:pin  # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:na   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:nari # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:pið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:pið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:pins # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:pin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:pin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +A:%>n Pos_Def  			;

LEXICON l34_6 ! funnin
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:nin  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:nan  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:nins # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:nir  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:na   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:nin  # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:na   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:nari # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:nið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:nið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:nins # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:nin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:nin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +A:%>n Pos_Def  			;

LEXICON l34_7 ! fallin
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:lin  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:nan  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:lins # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:nir  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:na   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:lin  # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:na   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:nari # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:lið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:lið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:lins # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:lin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:lin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +A:%>n Pos_Def  			;

LEXICON l34_8 ! drukkin
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:kin  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:nan  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:kins # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:nir  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:na   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:kin  # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:na   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:nari # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:kið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:kið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:kins # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:kin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:kin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +A:%>n Pos_Def  			;

LEXICON l34_9 ! treffin
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:fin  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:nan  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:fins # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:nir  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:na   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:fin  # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:na   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:nari # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:fið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:fið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:fins # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:fin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:fin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +A:%>n Pos_Def  			;
 
LEXICON l35 ! feingin
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:eingin  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:ongnan  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:ongnum  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:eingins # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:ongnir  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:ongnar  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:ongnum  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:ongna   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:eingin  # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:ongna   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:ongnari # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:ongnar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:ongnar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:ongnar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:ongnum  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:ongna	  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:eingið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:eingið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:ongnum  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:eingins # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:eingin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:eingin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:ongnum  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:ongna	  # ;
 +A:ongn 	Pos_Def  			;
 +A:ongn 	Comp_Ari 		;

LEXICON l35_1 ! teinkin
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:einkin  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:onknan  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:onknum  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:einkins # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:onknir  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:onknar  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:onknum  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:onkna   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:einkin  # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:onkna   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:onknari # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:onknar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:onknar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:onknar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:onknum  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:onkna	  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:einkið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:einkið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:onknum  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:einkins # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:einkin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:einkin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:onknum  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:onkna	  # ;
 +A:onkn 	Pos_Def  			;
 +A:onkn 	Comp_Ari 		;

LEXICON l35_2 ! sleikin
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:eikin  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:oknan  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:oknum  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:eikins # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:oknir  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:oknar  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:oknum  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:okna   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:eikin  # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:okna   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:oknari # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:oknar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:oknar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:oknar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:oknum  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:okna	# ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:eikið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:eikið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:oknum  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:eikins # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:eikin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:eikin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:oknum  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:okna   # ;
 +A:okn 	Pos_Def  			;
 +A:okn 	Comp_Ari 		;

LEXICON l36 ! liðugur
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:ðugur # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:dnan  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:dnum  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:ðins  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:dnir  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:dnar  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:dnum  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:dna   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:ðug   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:dna   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:dnari # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:dnar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:dnar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:dnar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:dnum  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:dna   # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:ðugt  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:ðugt  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:dnum  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:ðin   # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:ðug   # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:ðug   # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:dnum  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:dna   # ;
 +A:dn 	Pos_Def  		;
 +A:dn 	Comp_Ari 		;

LEXICON l37 ! grammur
 +A: Sg_Msc1 ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>um # ;
 +A: Pl_Msc1 ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>um # ;
 +A: Sg_Fem1 ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:^UUML%>   # ;
 +A: Pl_Fem1 ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>um # ;
 +A: Sg_Neu1 ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>um # ;
 +A: Pl_Neu1 ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:^UUML%>.  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:^UUML%>   # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>um # ;
 +A: Pos_Def ;
 +A: Comp_Ari ;

LEXICON l39/23
 l39 ;
 l23 ;
 
LEXICON l39 ! settur
 +A: adj_a   ; 
 +A: adj_def ;
 +A: Comp_Ari ;


! Irregular adjectives

LEXICON STOR
        +A:stór   adj_a                 ;
        +A:stór   adj_def               ;
    +A+Cmp:størr  indef_cmp_adj_decl    ;
 +A+Superl:størst indef_superl_adj_decl ;
