src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjectives
feingin:f l35 ;
liðugur:li l36 ;
grammur:gramm l37 ;
alstórur:al STOR ;
beinstórur:bein STOR ;
bjølgstórur:bjølg STOR ;
bollastórur:bolla STOR ;
bulstórur:bul STOR ;
búkstórur:búk STOR ;
framstórur:fram STOR ;
hástórur:há STOR ;
heiðstórur:heið STOR ;
heitstórur:heit STOR ;
hjartastórur:hjarta STOR ;
hugstórur:hug STOR ;
høvuðstórur:høvuð STOR ;
javnstórur:javn STOR ;
knotustórur:knotu STOR ;
kroppstórur:kropp STOR ;
liðastórur:liða STOR ;
limastórur:lima STOR ;
mannstórur:mann STOR ;
metstórur:met STOR ;
miðjustórur:miðju STOR ;
nevastórur:neva STOR ;
risastórur:risa STOR ;
sjálvstórur:sjálv STOR ;
stakstórur:stak STOR ;
tútastórur:túta STOR ;
vongstórur:vong STOR ;
hvøkkin:hvøk l34_8 ;
áfallin:áfal l34_7 ;
bergfallin:bergfal l34_7 ;
brellin:brel l34_7 ;
dagfallin:dagfal l34_7 ;
deyðadrukkin:deyðadruk l34_8 ;
drukkin:druk l34_8 ;
eyðfunnin:eyðfun l34_6 ;
eyðvunnin:eyðvun l34_6 ;
fjeppin:fjep l34_5 ;
fjøppin:fjøp l34_5 ;
fløgurunnin:fløgurun l34_6 ;
fráfallin:fráfal l34_7 ;
fyrstrunnin:fyrstrun l34_6 ;
harðvunnin:harðvun l34_6 ;
hálvdrukkin:hálvdruk l34_8 ;
hálvrunnin:hálvrun l34_6 ;
heiðursvunnin:heiðursvun l34_6 ;
heilrunnin:heilrun l34_6 ;
heimaspunnin:heimaspun l34_6 ;
heppin:hep l34_5 ;
hippin:hip l34_5 ;
hugfallin:hugfal l34_7 ;
hveppin:hvep l34_5 ;
innfallin:innfal l34_7 ;
innispunnin:innispun l34_6 ;
innsokkin:innsok l34_8 ;
íminnin:ímin l34_6 ;
ísstokkin:ísstok l34_8 ;
jarðfunnin:jarðfun l34_6 ;
kálvfallin:kálvfal l34_7 ;
krillillin:krillil l34_7 ;
krillin:kril l34_7 ;
kroppin:krop l34_5 ;
kveinin:kvei l34_6 ;
lívrunnin:lívrun l34_6 ;
lukkudrukkin:lukkudruk l34_8 ;
minnin:min l34_6 ;
mótfallin:mótfal l34_7 ;
nýfikkin:nýfik l34_8 ;
nýfjeppin:nýfjep l34_5 ;
nýfjøppin:nýfjøp l34_5 ;
ovdrukkin:ovdruk l34_8 ;
ódrukkin:ódruk l34_8 ;
óheppin:óhep l34_5 ;
ólívrunnin:ólívrun l34_6 ;
prippin:prip l34_5 ;
rakfallin:rakfal l34_7 ;
rættskaffin:rættskaf l34_9 ;
samrunnin:samrun l34_6 ;
sjálvrunnin:sjálvrun l34_6 ;
skoppin:skop l34_5 ;
snakkin:snak l34_8 ;
støkkin:støk l34_8 ;
svøllin:svøl l34_7 ;
torvunnin:torvun l34_6 ;
tráfikkin:tráfik l34_8 ;
treffin:tref l34_9 ;
tykkin:tyk l34_8 ;
vandfunnin:vandfun l34_6 ;
veggfellin:veggfel l34_7 ;
nýrunnin:nýrun l34_6 ;
tokkin:tok l34_8 ;
undanstøkkin:undanstøk l34_8 ;
ágeingin:á#g l35 ;
einsleingin:ein#sl l35 ;
heitfeingin:heit#f l35 ;
kaldfeingin:kald#f l35 ;
lukkusleingin:lukku#sl l35 ;
ófeingin:ó#f l35 ;
skjótteinkin:skjót#t l35_1 ;
sleikin:sl l35_2 ;
smáfeingin:smá#f l35 ;
smeikin:sm l35_2 ;
stórsleingin:stór#sl l35 ;
viðfeingin:við#f l35 ;
viðgeingin:við#g l35 ;
alsettur:alsett l39 ;
baklittur:baklitt l39 ;
bjølgmettur:bjølgmett l39 ;
breidleittur:breidleitt l39 ;
dassleittur:dassleitt l39 ;
dossleittur:dossleitt l39 ;
eftirskoyttur:eftirskoytt l39 ;
eyðbýttur:eyðbýtt l39 ;
fittur:fitt l39 ;
framsettur:framsett l39 ;
grálittur:grálitt l39 ;
hálvroyttur:hálvroytt l39 ;
kinnlittur:kinnlitt l39 ;
kvikleittur:kvikleitt l39 ;
margbroyttur:margbroytt l39 ;
munnfittur:munnfitt l39 ;
ófittur:ófitt l39 ;
rangstoyttur:rangstoytt l39 ;
rustlittur:rustlitt l39 ;
skersettur:skersett l39 ;
steinmettur:steinmett l39 ;
tjóvssettur:tjóvssett l39 ;
tvíføttur:tvíføtt l39 ;
támleittur:támleitt l39 ;
hálvliðugur:hálv#li l36 ;
óliðugur:ó#li l36 ;
slop l34_5 ;
strammur:stramm l37 ;
forsvun l34_6 ;
hittur:hitt l39 ;
hættur:hætt l39/23 ;
sokkin:sok l34_8 ;
stokkin:stok l34_8 ;
fallin:fal l34_7 ;
svollin:svol l34_7 ;
runnin:run l34_6 ;
sloppin:slop l34_5 ;
fullliðugur:full#li l36 ;
pengagrammur:penga#gramm l37 ;
peningagrammur:peninga#gramm l37 ;
huggrammur:hug#gramm l37 ;
fiskigrammur:fiski#gramm l37 ;
lógarásettur:lógar#á#sett l39 ;
avgýttur:av#gýtt l39 ;
samansokkin:saman#sok l34_8 ;
sundurstokkin:sundur#stok l34_8 ;
úrstokkin:úr#stok l34_8 ;
avstokkin:av#stok l34_8 ;
burturfallin:burtur#fal l34_7 ;
niðurfallin:niður#fal l34_7 ;
avfallin:av#fal l34_7 ;
samansvollin:saman#svol l34_7 ;
uppspunnin:upp#spun l34_6 ;
samanrunnin:saman#run l34_6 ;
avafturrunnin:av#aftur#run l34_6 ;
hevdvunnin:hevd#vun l34_6 ;
undansloppin:undan#slop l34_5 ;
uppsloppin:upp#slop l34_5 ;
